Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1304
Change of venue; witnesses recognized to appear.

When a change of venue is allowed, the court shall recognize the witnesses on the part of the state to appear before the court in which the prisoner is to be tried.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 458, p. 824;

R.S.1913, § 9027;

C.S.1922, § 10051;

C.S.1929, § 29-1304;

R.S.1943, § 29-1304.

Upon change of venue, recognizance may be required of witnesses to appear before the court in which the accused is to be tried. State v. Furstenau, 167 Neb. 439, 93 N.W.2d 384 (1958).

Court cannot create indebtedness against county by appointing bailiff to detain witness. Shaw v. Holt County, 88 Neb. 348, 129 N.W. 552 (1911).